Hawaii statutes.
[§706-651] Payments by defendant;
order of priority. When a defendant is ordered to make payments pursuant
to chapters 351, 706, 846F, and 853, or as otherwise provided by law, payments
shall be made in the following order of priority:

(1) Restitution;

(2) Crime victims compensation fee;

(3) Probation services fee;

(4) Human trafficking victim services fee;

(5) Other fees, including but not limited to internet
crimes against children fee and drug demand reduction assessment fee;

(6) DNA analysis monetary assessment; and

(7) Fines. [L 2016, c 231, §14]

COMMENTARY ON §706-651

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, added this section, which
establishes the priority for payments that a defendant is ordered to make,
including restitution, crime victims compensation fee, probation services fee,
human trafficking victims services fees, DNA analysis monetary assessment, and
fines. Conference Committee Report No. 138-16.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next